Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Chapter 23

Uniformity in Tax Increment Financing Act of 2012

9-23-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Uniformity in Tax Increment Financing Act of 2012.”

Acts 2012, ch. 605, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 605, § 6 provided that the CRA Act, which is the Community Redevelopment Act of 1998, as amended, being chapter 987 of the Public Acts of 1998, which act has not been codified, is hereby amended to add the following as a new section: “In the event of any conflict between the provisions of this act and title 9, chapter 23, the provisions of title 9, chapter 23 shall control.”

Acts 2012, ch. 605, § 8 provided that the act, which enacted this chapter, shall not apply to a plan, or any amendment to such plan, for which required public hearings were conducted prior to March 21, 2012, without the concurrence of the tax increment agency, all affected taxing agencies, and the holders of any indebtedness secured by the tax revenues allocable pursuant to the plan.

9-23-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Active plan” means a plan that is currently producing tax increment revenues;

“Base taxes” means the property taxes, if any, that were levied by a taxing agency and payable with respect to the property within a plan area (other than any portion of such taxes that is a debt service amount) for the year prior to the date the plan was approved;

“Best interest of the state” for purposes of approving payment or expenditure of funds, or financing the cost of a privately-owned project with tax increment revenues, means the project would not have occurred but for the payment, expenditure or financing;

For purposes of an extended plan term, “best interest of the state” means an extended plan term or term extension is reasonably required for plan completion;

“Chief financial officer” with respect to a taxing agency means the officer or employee of a taxing agency that is responsible for overseeing the budget and finances of such taxing agency or such other officer or employee as may be designated by the taxing agency for purposes of this chapter;

“Community redevelopment agency” means a community redevelopment agency created by or designated pursuant to the CRA Act;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of economic and community development;

“Comptroller” means the comptroller of the treasury;

“CRA Act” means the Community Redevelopment Act of 1998, as amended, being 1998 Public Chapter No. 987, which act has not been codified;

“Dedicated taxes” means that portion of property taxes, if any, designated by a taxing agency to pay debt service on the taxing agency's debt;

“Governing body” means the board or body in which the general legislative powers of a municipality or taxing agency are vested;

“Housing authority” means a housing authority organized in accordance with title 13, chapter 20, or any public entity exercising the redevelopment powers of a housing authority pursuant to such chapter;

“Industrial development corporation” means any industrial development corporation organized pursuant to title 7, chapter 53;

“Municipality” means any county, metropolitan government or incorporated city or town in this state;

“Plan” means a redevelopment plan approved pursuant to title 13, chapter 20, an economic impact plan approved pursuant to title 7, chapter 53, or a community redevelopment plan approved pursuant to the CRA Act;

“Plan area” means the area identified in any plan as being subject to such plan;

“Public infrastructure” shall mean roads, streets, publicly-owned or privately-owned parking lots, facilities or garages, traffic signals, sidewalks or other public improvements that are available for public use, utility improvements and storm water and drainage improvements, whether or not located on public property or a publicly-dedicated easement, that are necessary or desirable, as determined by the tax increment agency;

“Tax increment agency” means a housing authority, industrial development corporation and/or community redevelopment agency;

“Tax increment revenues” means incremental property tax revenues to be allocated by a taxing agency to a tax increment agency pursuant to a tax increment statute and this chapter;

“Tax increment statutes” means title 7, chapter 53, title 13, chapter 20 and the CRA Act; and

“Taxing agency” means any county, city, town, metropolitan government or other public entity that levies property taxes on property within a plan area and that has approved the plan.

Acts 2012, ch. 605, § 2; 2017, ch. 17, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 605, § 6 provided that the CRA Act, which is the Community Redevelopment Act of 1998, as amended, being chapter 987 of the Public Acts of 1998, which act has not been codified, is hereby amended to add the following as a new section: “In the event of any conflict between the provisions of this act and title 9, chapter 23, the provisions of title 9, chapter 23 shall control.”

Acts 2012, ch. 605, § 8 provided that the act, which enacted this chapter, shall not apply to a plan, or any amendment to such plan, for which required public hearings were conducted prior to March 21, 2012, without the concurrence of the tax increment agency, all affected taxing agencies, and the holders of any indebtedness secured by the tax revenues allocable pursuant to the plan.

9-23-103. Division of property taxes levied upon property located within area subject to plan.

Notwithstanding any tax increment statute to the contrary, the property taxes levied upon property located within the area subject to a plan shall be divided as follows:

Base taxes and dedicated taxes shall be allocated to and shall be paid, as provided in this chapter, to the respective taxing agencies as taxes levied by such taxing agencies on all other property are paid; provided, that in any year in which the taxes on any property are less than the base and dedicated taxes, there shall be allocated and paid to the respective taxing agencies only those taxes actually imposed and collected; and provided further, that, in any year or years in which the base tax would be diminished solely due to a rate reduction under title 67, chapter 5, part 17, the base tax shall nevertheless be established at the amount originally determined; and

Subject to specific constraints in this chapter, any excess of taxes levied by a participating tax agency, over the base and dedicated taxes, shall be allocated to and shall be paid to the tax increment agency as provided in the relevant tax increment statute to be applied or reserved for the purposes permitted by such statute and this chapter; provided, that:

A portion of the excess taxes may be allocated for administrative purposes as provided in this part; and

Excess taxes beyond amounts necessary to fund or reserve for eligible expenditures under the applicable tax increment statute, may be applied to principal and interest of debt incurred to finance such eligible expenditures, or shall revert to the taxing agency general fund.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) or the tax increment statutes to the contrary, any plan may allocate an amount greater than the base and dedicated taxes to any taxing agency that levied the taxes.

If the area subject to a plan has, at any time, multiple parcels of property, a plan may provide that the base and dedicated taxes shall be calculated on an aggregate basis or on the basis of each parcel within the area subject to the plan. If such amounts are calculated on an aggregate basis, a taxing agency shall not be required to allocate any payments of tax increment revenues to the tax increment agency until the taxing agency has collected an amount equal to the base and dedicated taxes with respect to all parcels within the area subject to the plan.

For purposes of allocating tax increment revenues hereunder, a plan may authorize a tax increment agency to separately group one (1) or more parcels within a plan area for purposes of calculating and allocating the tax increment revenues hereunder, and in such cases, the allocation of tax increment revenues shall be calculated and made based upon each such parcel or group of parcels, and not the entire area subject to the plan. Any plan may also provide for and/or permit the allocation of tax increment revenues with respect to any parcel or group of parcels within a plan area to begin in different years in order to match tax increment revenues with the purposes for which such revenues will be applied as determined by the tax increment agency.

A plan may provide the date or dates in each year that each taxing agency shall be required to allocate tax increment revenues to the tax increment agency; and if a plan does not provide the dates for such allocations, tax increment revenues shall be allocated and distributed to each taxing agency no later than March 31 in each year with respect to taxes collected with respect to the prior tax year. Unless a plan provides to the contrary or the taxing agency and tax increment agency otherwise agree, tax increment revenues that are payable with respect to delinquent taxes shall be paid to the tax increment agency within thirty (30) days of receipt by the taxing agency. Partial payments collected prior to the delinquency date shall be allocated first to base and dedicated taxes.

Unless a taxing agency and tax increment agency agree otherwise or a plan provides otherwise, a taxing agency shall pay to the tax increment agency with the payment of any tax increment revenues that are realized from delinquent tax payments, a pro-rata share of the interest on such delinquent taxes based upon the portion of the interest on the delinquent taxes that is attributable to such tax increment revenues.

If the debt service amount has not been established by the governing body of the taxing agency, the debt service amount can be established by a certificate of the chief financial officer of the taxing agency designating such amount with respect to each tax year.

Acts 2012, ch. 605, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 605, § 6 provided that the CRA Act, which is the Community Redevelopment Act of 1998, as amended, being chapter 987 of the Public Acts of 1998, which act has not been codified, is hereby amended to add the following as a new section: “In the event of any conflict between the provisions of this act and title 9, chapter 23, the provisions of title 9, chapter 23 shall control.”

Acts 2012, ch. 605, § 8 provided that the act, which enacted this chapter, shall not apply to a plan, or any amendment to such plan, for which required public hearings were conducted prior to March 21, 2012, without the concurrence of the tax increment agency, all affected taxing agencies, and the holders of any indebtedness secured by the tax revenues allocable pursuant to the plan.

9-23-104. Time limitations on allocations.

Notwithstanding any tax increment statute or any plan to the contrary, no allocation of tax increment revenues shall be made with respect to any property for a period of more than twenty (20) years in the case of an economic impact plan, or thirty (30) years in the case of a redevelopment plan or community redevelopment plan as defined in §9-23-102, unless both the commissioner and the comptroller have made a written determination that a longer period is in the best interest of the state. If the written determination approving or declining the longer term is not rendered within thirty (30) days, the longer term is deemed approved.

Acts 2012, ch. 605, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 605, § 6 provided that the CRA Act, which is the Community Redevelopment Act of 1998, as amended, being chapter 987 of the Public Acts of 1998, which act has not been codified, is hereby amended to add the following as a new section: “In the event of any conflict between the provisions of this act and title 9, chapter 23, the provisions of title 9, chapter 23 shall control.”

Acts 2012, ch. 605, § 8 provided that the act, which enacted this chapter, shall not apply to a plan, or any amendment to such plan, for which required public hearings were conducted prior to March 21, 2012, without the concurrence of the tax increment agency, all affected taxing agencies, and the holders of any indebtedness secured by the tax revenues allocable pursuant to the plan.

9-23-105. Administrative expenses.

Notwithstanding any tax increment statute to the contrary, any plan may provide that a total of up to five percent (5%) of incremental tax revenues may be set aside for administrative expenses, including expenses incurred by the tax increment agency and tax agency administrative offices (assessor of property and/or trustee or other tax collecting official) in administering the plan, and including a reasonable allocation of overhead expenses.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), a transit-oriented redevelopment plan approved pursuant to title 13, chapter 20, part 7, that includes tax increment financing of one million dollars ($1,000,000) or more may provide that not more than three percent (3%) of incremental tax revenues may be set aside for administrative expenses, including expenses incurred by the tax increment agency and tax agency administrative offices (assessor of property and/or trustee or other tax collecting official) in administering the plan, including a reasonable allocation of overhead expenses.

Acts 2012, ch. 605, § 2; 2019, ch. 317, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 605, § 6 provided that the CRA Act, which is the Community Redevelopment Act of 1998, as amended, being chapter 987 of the Public Acts of 1998, which act has not been codified, is hereby amended to add the following as a new section: “In the event of any conflict between the provisions of this act and title 9, chapter 23, the provisions of title 9, chapter 23 shall control.”

Acts 2012, ch. 605, § 8 provided that the act, which enacted this chapter, shall not apply to a plan, or any amendment to such plan, for which required public hearings were conducted prior to March 21, 2012, without the concurrence of the tax increment agency, all affected taxing agencies, and the holders of any indebtedness secured by the tax revenues allocable pursuant to the plan.

9-23-106. Preparation and submission of redevelopment plan information.

After the approval by each applicable taxing agency of a plan, the applicable tax increment agency shall transmit to the appropriate assessor of property for each taxing agency and the chief financial officer of each taxing agency a copy of the description of all property within the area subject to the plan (including parcel numbers with respect to real property), a copy of each resolution of each taxing agency approving the plan and the base tax amount with respect to all property subject to the plan.

Each tax increment agency shall also file a copy of the information described in subsection (a) with the comptroller; and by October 1, the tax increment agency shall file with the comptroller an annual statement of all tax increment revenues allocated to the tax increment agency with respect to each active plan.

The filing requirements of this section are the only filings required of tax increment agencies subject to this chapter.

Acts 2012, ch. 605, § 2; 2015, ch. 71, §§ 1, 2; 2017, ch. 17, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 605, § 6 provided that the CRA Act, which is the Community Redevelopment Act of 1998, as amended, being chapter 987 of the Public Acts of 1998, which act has not been codified, is hereby amended to add the following as a new section: “In the event of any conflict between the provisions of this act and title 9, chapter 23, the provisions of title 9, chapter 23 shall control.”

Acts 2012, ch. 605, § 8 provided that the act, which enacted this chapter, shall not apply to a plan, or any amendment to such plan, for which required public hearings were conducted prior to March 21, 2012, without the concurrence of the tax increment agency, all affected taxing agencies, and the holders of any indebtedness secured by the tax revenues allocable pursuant to the plan.

9-23-107. Policies and procedures.

Any taxing agency and tax increment agency may agree upon, approve and amend policies and procedures for allocating and calculating tax increment revenues and implementing this chapter and the applicable tax increment statute; provided, however, such policies and procedures shall not conflict with this chapter or any tax increment statute.

Acts 2012, ch. 605, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 605, § 6 provided that the CRA Act, which is the Community Redevelopment Act of 1998, as amended, being chapter 987 of the Public Acts of 1998, which act has not been codified, is hereby amended to add the following as a new section: “In the event of any conflict between the provisions of this act and title 9, chapter 23, the provisions of title 9, chapter 23 shall control.”

Acts 2012, ch. 605, § 8 provided that the act, which enacted this chapter, shall not apply to a plan, or any amendment to such plan, for which required public hearings were conducted prior to March 21, 2012, without the concurrence of the tax increment agency, all affected taxing agencies, and the holders of any indebtedness secured by the tax revenues allocable pursuant to the plan.

9-23-108. Application of proceeds.

Notwithstanding any provision of title 7, chapter 53 to the contrary, the proceeds of tax increment revenues payable to an industrial development corporation shall only be applied to pay public infrastructure costs, the costs of acquisition of a project site, the cost of improvements to a project site, including, but not limited to, demolition, clearing, grading, utility connections to public or private utilities, buildings constructed on a project site, equipment located on a project site, architects and engineering costs for the design of any improvements to a project site, access drives on a project site, landscaping for a project site, and stormwater facilities on a project site, the costs of issuance of bonds or notes relating to the foregoing costs or debt service related to the foregoing costs; provided, however, and other than for land, improvements, or equipment utilized for public infrastructure, that such revenues may be used for privately-owned land, improvements, or equipment, or for other purposes authorized by title 7, chapter 53, but not specified above, only if both the commissioner and the comptroller have made a written determination that the use of tax increment revenues for such purposes is in the best interest of the state. A request for this determination shall be in writing, and if the written determination approving or rejecting the proposed use is not rendered within thirty (30) days, the use is deemed approved.

Acts 2012, ch. 605, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 605, § 6 provided that the CRA Act, which is the Community Redevelopment Act of 1998, as amended, being chapter 987 of the Public Acts of 1998, which act has not been codified, is hereby amended to add the following as a new section: “In the event of any conflict between the provisions of this act and title 9, chapter 23, the provisions of title 9, chapter 23 shall control.”

Acts 2012, ch. 605, § 8 provided that the act, which enacted this chapter, shall not apply to a plan, or any amendment to such plan, for which required public hearings were conducted prior to March 21, 2012, without the concurrence of the tax increment agency, all affected taxing agencies, and the holders of any indebtedness secured by the tax revenues allocable pursuant to the plan.